Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 1. Game Animals and Game Birds

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d Fish and Game § 53.

38 C.J.S. Game §§ 52, 53.

§ 23-2-101.
Fees; restrictions; nonresident application fee; nonresident licenses; verification of residency required; donation of refunded application fees.

Any qualified person may purchase a hunting license from the department or its authorized selling agents except as otherwise provided. Purchase of a license entitles the licensee to take any animal, bird or fish provided on the license within Wyoming at the time, in a place, in a manner and in an amount as provided by law and the orders of the commission. At the time of application for a resident license under this section, the applicant shall provide a valid Wyoming driver’s license or a copy thereof, or other proof of residency. The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations stating what proof of residency is required so that only bona fide Wyoming residents, as defined in W.S. 23-1-102(a)(ix), receive resident licenses. For purposes of purchasing a lifetime resident license under subsection (j) of this section, an applicant shall have been a resident as defined in W.S. 23-1-102(a)(ix) continuously for a ten (10) year period immediately preceding the application date.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 92, § 2.

The resident’s or nonresident’s license must bear the signature of the landowner, lessee, or agent of the owner on whose private property he is hunting or the legitimate proof as evidence that permission to hunt has been granted.

The commission may issue big or trophy game licenses in areas in which all licenses initially authorized were not purchased or in which additional harvest is desired, allowing a licensee to take a big or trophy game animal of such sex or age as designated by the commission. The fee for the license may be reduced by the commission to the level necessary to achieve the desired management objectives, but in no case shall a resident or nonresident license fee be less than the landowner’s coupon fee.

Resident and nonresident license applicants shall pay an application fee in an amount specified by this subsection upon submission of an application for purchase of any limited quota drawing for big or trophy game license or wild bison license. The resident application fee shall be five dollars ($5.00) and the nonresident application fee shall be fifteen dollars ($15.00). The application fee is in addition to the fees prescribed by subsections (f) and (j) of this section and by W.S.

23-2-107

and shall be payable to the department either directly or through an authorized selling agent of the department. At the beginning of each month, the commission shall set aside all of the fees collected during calendar year 1980 and not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the fees collected thereafter pursuant to this subsection to establish and maintain a working balance of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00), to compensate owners or lessees of property damaged by game animals and game birds.

Forty percent (40%) of available nonresident elk licenses, forty percent (40%) of available nonresident deer licenses and forty percent (40%) of available nonresident antelope licenses for any one (1) calendar year shall as established by the commission, be offered to nonresident applicants upon receipt of the fee prescribed by this subsection. Seventy-five (75) of the nonresident deer licenses set aside pursuant to this subsection shall be used for a national bow hunt for deer. The licenses authorized by this subsection shall be offered by drawing to nonresident applicants prior to the drawing for the remaining nonresident licenses issued. The licenses offered under this subsection shall be issued in a manner prescribed by rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit any unsuccessful applicant for a nonresident license pursuant to this subsection from submitting an application for any licenses remaining after the drawing during the calendar year in which the application under this subsection was submitted. The following fees shall be collected by the department and are in addition to the nonresident license fee for the appropriate big game species imposed under subsection (j) of this section and the application fee imposed under subsection (e) of this section:

Nonresident elk license ..... $576.00 in addition to the license fee imposed under paragraph (j)(xix) of this section;

Nonresident deer license ..... $288.00 in addition to the license fee imposed under paragraph (j)(xv) of this section;

Nonresident antelope license ..... $288.00 in addition to the license fee imposed under paragraph (j)(xxxi) of this section.

In promulgating rules and regulations for the taking of bighorn sheep and moose, the commission shall not discriminate between residents and nonresidents regarding the maturity and horn size of the animals which may be taken. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as prohibiting the commission from issuing a different number of licenses for residents and nonresidents, from requiring a preference point fee from nonresidents only pursuant to subsection (m) of this section or from issuing reduced price ewe and lamb bighorn sheep licenses as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

In addition to other fees under this section, persons applying for a license or tag under this section may pay a voluntary fee of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount to fund search and rescue activities in the state. The department shall provide information on the license or tag application form that the applicant may pay the fee under this subsection. Any voluntary fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the search and rescue account created by W.S.

19-13-301

.

Subject to W.S. 23-2-101(f), 23-1-705(e) and the applicable fee under W.S.

23-1-701

, the following hunting licenses and tags may be purchased for the fee indicated and subject to the limitations provided:

Resident black bear license; one (1) black bear . . . . . $45.00

Nonresident black bear license; one (1) black bear . . . . . $371.00

Resident mountain lion license; one (1) mountain lion . . . . . $30.00

Nonresident mountain lion license; one (1) mountain lion . . . . . $371.00

Resident daily game bird/small game license;
all game birds except wild turkey . . . . . $7.00

Nonresident daily game bird/small game license;
all game birds except wild turkey . . . . . $20.00

Resident lifetime game bird and small game license;
all game birds except wild turkey . . . . . $309.00

Resident lifetime game bird/small game and fishing license;
all game birds except wild turkey . . . . . $494.00

Resident game bird/small game license;
all game birds except wild turkey . . . . . $25.00

Nonresident game bird/small game license;
all game birds except wild turkey . . . . . $72.00

Nonresident youth game bird/small game license;
all game birds except wild turkey . . . . . $40.00

Resident archery license . . . . . $14.00

Nonresident archery license . . . . . $70.00

Resident deer license; one (1) deer . . . . . $40.00

Nonresident deer license; one (1) deer . . . . . $372.00

Resident youth deer license; one (1) deer . . . . . $15.00

Nonresident youth deer license; one (1) deer . . . . . $110.00

Resident elk license; one (1) elk . . . . . $55.00

Nonresident elk license; one (1) elk, fishing privileges . . . . . $690.00

Resident youth elk license; one (1) elk . . . . . $25.00

Nonresident youth elk license; one (1) elk, fishing privileges . . . . . $275.00

Resident bighorn sheep license; one (1) bighorn sheep . . . . . $150.00

Nonresident bighorn sheep license; one (1) bighorn sheep . . . . . $2,318.00

Resident mountain goat license; one (1) mountain goat . . . . . $150.00

Nonresident mountain goat license; one (1) mountain goat . . . . . . $2,160.00

Resident moose license; one (1) moose . . . . . . $150.00

Nonresident moose license; one (1) moose . . . . . $1,980.00

Resident grizzly bear license; one (1) grizzly bear . . . . . $600.00

Nonresident grizzly bear license; one (1) grizzly bear . . . . . $6,000.00

Resident antelope license; one (1) antelope . . . . . $35.00

Nonresident antelope license; one (1) antelope . . . . . $324.00

Resident youth antelope license; one (1) antelope . . . . . $15.00

Nonresident youth antelope license; one (1) antelope . . . . . $110.00

Resident license to capture falcons for falconry purposes . . . . . $37.00

Nonresident license to capture falcons for falconry purposes . . . . . $247.00

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 144, § 2.

License to hunt with falcon; game birds, small game animals . . . . . $14.00

Resident turkey license . . . . . $14.00

Nonresident turkey license . . . . . $72.00

Wyoming interstate game tag . . . . . $6.00

Resident game bird license; all game birds except turkey . . . . . $14.00

Resident small game license . . . . . $14.00

From and after the date gray wolves are removed from the list of experimental nonessential population, endangered species or threatened species in Wyoming as provided by W.S.

23-1-108

:

Resident gray wolf license . . . . . $19.00

Nonresident gray wolf license . . . . . $185.00

Resident youth archery license . . . . . $6.00

Nonresident youth archery license . . . . . $12.00

Resident lifetime archery license . . . . . $206.00

Any resident qualified to purchase a moose or ram bighorn sheep hunting license under subsection (j) of this section may pay a fee of seven dollars ($7.00) in lieu of applying for a moose or ram bighorn sheep hunting license. Payment of the fee for a particular species under this subsection shall authorize the person to accumulate points under W.S. 23-1-703(b) for that year in the same manner as if he had unsuccessfully applied for a hunting license for that species. Payment of the fee shall be made in compliance with application dates.

Subject to the provisions of this subsection, as part of any preference point program for nonresident antelope, nonresident ram bighorn sheep, nonresident moose, nonresident deer or nonresident elk, the commission may establish a nonrefundable fee to be either withheld from the license fee remitted or submitted separately when application for a license or preference point is made through electronic licensing, and may also establish a fee to be paid in lieu of applying for licenses that are limited in quota. Retention of the established fee or payment of the fee in lieu of applying shall authorize the person to accumulate a preference point for future drawings for licenses that are limited in quota for the applicable species in accordance with rules of the commission. The rules may provide for the loss of all accumulated points for persons failing to apply or to pay the in lieu fee in two (2) consecutive calendar years. The fee for any program under this subsection for antelope, deer or elk shall be established by rule and shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00) per species. Payment of the fee shall be made in compliance with application dates. Nothing in this subsection authorizes the commission to establish or retain a fee for resident moose or resident ram bighorn sheep license preference points in addition to the fee established by subsection (k) of this section or to establish rules for ram bighorn sheep or moose preference point drawings in conflict with the provisions of W.S. 23-1-703(b). For nonresident ram bighorn sheep and nonresident moose licenses, the commission may establish by rule a nonrefundable preference point fee to be withheld from either the license fee remitted or submitted separately when application for a license or preference point is made through electronic licensing and may establish a fee in lieu of making application in an amount greater than that established under subsection (k) of this section, but neither fee shall exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00). Fees established under this subsection may be set at lower amounts for youth license applicants.

In addition to other fees under this section, persons applying for a license or tag under this section may pay any whole dollar amount to fund the purchase of access easements by the commission to provide access to public and private lands.

For issuing each harvest information permit required under federal law license selling agents and commission employees shall charge the fee authorized by W.S. 23-1-701(b)(iii).

In addition to other fees under this section, persons applying for a license or tag under this section may pay any whole dollar amount to support wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system. The department shall provide information on the application form that the applicant may pay the contribution under this subsection. Funds collected under this subsection shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be credited to the wildlife conservation account created by W.S. 31-2-231(b). The department shall deduct and retain an amount equal to the administrative costs incurred in complying with this subsection.

In addition to other fees under this section, persons applying for a license or tag under this section may pay a voluntary fee of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount to fund predator control activities in the state. The department shall provide information on the license or tag application form that the applicant may pay the fee under this subsection. Any voluntary fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in a separate account within the game and fish fund and shall only be expended as determined by the commission for management and control of predator populations and depredating animals. The commission may consider projects that mitigate damage caused to livestock, wildlife and crops by predatory animals, predacious birds and depredating animals or for the protection of human health and safety and may also use these funds for the purposes specified in W.S.

11-6-307

and

23-1-901

. As used in this subsection, “depredating animal” means any trophy game animal or furbearing animal that causes damage.

An applicant may elect to provide that any fee paid under this section that is refundable if the applicant is unsuccessful, or portions of the fee as provided in this subsection, be retained and deposited by the department in the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust income account created by W.S. 9-15-103(b) or the game and fish access account created by W.S. 23-1-501(h), as determined by the applicant. The department shall provide information on the application form that the applicant may elect at the time of application to make a contribution to one (1) or both of the accounts specified under this subsection if the applicant is unsuccessful. The department shall allow the applicant to contribute the entire amount of the fee or select a portion of the fee to contribute as specified by the department, not to exceed the amount of the fee. Any administrative expenses incurred by the department for donations into the account created by W.S. 9-15-103(b) shall be reimbursed to the department by the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust income account.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 34; 1943, ch. 112, § 6; 1945, ch. 84, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 47-207; Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; 1949, ch. 90, § 1; 1951, ch. 71, § 1; 1955, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-86; Laws 1959, ch. 196, § 1; 1961, ch. 162, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 132, § 1; ch. 147, § 1; ch. 184, § 3; 1969, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 75, § 1; ch. 129, §§ 8, 9; 1971, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 199, § 1; ch. 233, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-33; Laws 1975, ch. 45, § 1; 1977, ch. 96, § 1; 1979, ch. 29, § 1; ch. 98, § 1; 1987, ch. 64, § 1; 1989, ch. 23, § 2; ch. 24, § 1; ch. 263, § 1; 1991, ch. 254, § 1; 1993, ch. 132, § 1; 1994, ch. 50, § 1; 1996, ch. 48, § 1; ch. 121, §§ 2, 3; 1998, ch. 66, § 1; ch. 99, § 2; 1999, ch. 26, § 1; ch. 27, § 1; ch. 92, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 6, § 1; ch. 27, § 1; 2003, ch. 75, § 1; ch. 114, § 1; ch. 115, § 2; ch. 144, §§ 1, 2; Laws 2004, ch. 30, § 1; ch. 36, § 1; 2005, ch. 54, § 1; 2006, ch. 9, § 1, ch. 76, § 1; 2007, ch. 2, § 1; 2009, ch. 83, § 1; 2010, ch. 45, § 1; 2012, ch. 3, § 1; 2013 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 27, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 48, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; 2020 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to deposits into the game and fish fund, see § 23-1-501(d).

The 2003 amendments. —

The first 2003 amendment by ch. 75, § 1, effective January 1, 2004, substituted “forty percent (40%) of available nonresident deer licenses and forty percent (40%) of available nonresident antelope” for “twenty percent (20%) of available nonresident deer licenses and thirty percent (30%) of available nonresident antelope” in the first sentence of (f); and doubled the fees set out in (f)(i) through (iii).

The second 2003 amendment by ch. 114, § 1, effective January 1, 2004, inserted (j)(vii), and redesignated the subsequent paragraphs accordingly.

The third 2003 amendment, by ch. 115, § 2, added (j)(xlii) (now (j)(xliii)).

Laws 2003, ch. 115, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon the completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2003.

The fourth 2003 amendment by ch. 144, §§ 1 and 2, effective January 1, 2004, substituted “four dollars ($4.00)” for “three dollars ($3.00)” and “twelve dollars ($12.00)” for “ten dollars ($10.00)” in the second sentence in (e); increased the license fees set out in several paragraphs in (j); and repealed the special bird license provided for in (j)(xxxvi).

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment by ch. 30, § 1, effective January 1, 2005, added the language beginning “or from requiring a preference point fee” in (g); substituted “Any resident” for “Effective January 1, 2000, any person” in (k); added (m), and redesignated former (m) as (n).

The second 2004 amendment by ch. 36, § 1, effective January 1, 2005, in the introductory language in (j) inserted “and the applicable fee under W.S.

23-1-701

,” and added (n) (now (o)).

This section has been set out as specified by the legislative service office.

The 2005 amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “500.00” for “1,750.00” in (j)(xxviii) and “5,000.00” for “17,500.00” in (j)(xxix).

The 2006 amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, by ch. 9, § 1, substituted “either withheld from the license fee” for “retained from the license fee” and “remitted or submitted separately when application for a license or preference point is made through electronic licensing” for “submitted” in two places in (m).

Laws 2006, ch. 9, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2006.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Laws 2006, ch. 76, § 1, amends this section effective August 1, 2006, by inserting “23-1-705(e)” in the introductory language of (j).

The 2007 amendments. —

The 2007 amendment, effective January 1, 2008, in (e), substituted “five dollars ($5.00)” for “four dollars ($4.00),” and “fourteen dollars ($14.00)” for “twelve dollars ($12.00)”; and changed dollar amounts for nonresident license fees in (f)(i) through (iii) and (j)(xliii).

The 2009 amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, in (g) added “or from issuing reduced price ewe and lamb bighorn sheep licenses as provided in subsection (d) of this section” following “subsection (m) of this section” in the last sentence, and in (k) and (m) inserted “ram” preceding “big horn sheep”.

The 2010 amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, added (j)(xliv) and (j)(xlv).

The 2012 amendments. —

The 2012 amendment,
effective July 1, 2012, in (d), deleted the former second sentence which read: “Additional elk licenses under this subsection shall be restricted to allowing any one (1) hunter to take a maximum of two (2) elk in a season under all licenses held.”

The 2013 amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “a voluntary fee of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount” for “one dollar ($1.00)” in the first sentence; and added “voluntary” at the beginning of the last sentence in (h).

The 2015 amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective January 1, 2016, added (j)(xlvi).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (k), substituted “subsection (j)” for “subsection (b).”

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 159, § 1, effective Jan. 1, 2018, in (d)(i), substituted “25.00” for “$22.00”; in (d)(ii), substituted “100.00” for “90.00”; and in (d)(iii), substituted “309.00” for “300.00.”

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 48, § 1, effective January 1, 2021, added (q).

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, added (p).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added “$” preceding the dollar values throughout (j).

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 43, § 1,
effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence of (g), added “and” following “maturity,” deleted “or sex” following “horn size”; substituted “bighorn” for “big horn” twice in the first sentence of (k); and made a related change.

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, added (r).

Editor's notes. —

There are no subsections (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2004, ch. 30, § 1, added (m) and redesignated former (m) as (n). Laws 2004, ch. 36, § 1, added (n). The subsection added by ch. 36 has been redesignated as (o) by the legislative service office.

Laws 2004, ch. 30, § 1, authorizes the game and fish commission to adopt rules and regulations implementing the provisions of the act upon the effective date of this section.

Laws 2004, ch. 30, § 3(a), makes the act effective immediately upon the completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Constitutionality. —

Nonresident hunter failed to establish a violation of the Equal Protection Clause with regard to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

23-2-101

and

23-1-703

, which charge higher fees for nonresident hunters and establish a quota system for licenses, because the statutes are reasonably related to a number of legitimate ends because they help with the costs of managing wildlife and regulate the resource's safe and efficient use. Schutz v. Thorne, 415 F.3d 1128,

2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 13906

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2005), cert. denied, 546 U.S. 1174, 126 S. Ct. 1340, 164 L. Ed. 2d 55, 2006 U.S. LEXIS 1203 (U.S. 2006).

Law reviews. —

For note including discussion of discrimination against nonresident hunters through license fees, see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1974).

For comment, “Reserving Wildlife for Resident Consumption: Is the Dormant Commerce Clause the Outfitters' White Knight?,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 125 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Private grant or reservation to hunt on another's land, 49 ALR2d 1395.

§ 23-2-102.
Age restrictions; game animals; game birds.

The minimum age to take any big or trophy game animal is twelve (12) years, except that any person may take a big or trophy game animal at eleven (11) years of age if the person will attain twelve (12) years of age by the end of that calendar year. Any person authorized by this subsection under the age of fourteen (14) years shall at all times when hunting be accompanied by a person over the age of majority who possesses and can exhibit a certificate of competency and safety as specified in W.S.

23-2-106

or who currently holds, or has been issued a Wyoming big game hunting license within the last five (5) years. If the person accompanying the hunter under the age of fourteen (14) years is not the parent or guardian of the hunter, the hunter shall have in his possession a permission slip signed by his parent or guardian allowing him to hunt under supervision. Each accompanying adult shall supervise not more than one (1) hunter under the age of fourteen (14) years. Any person under the age of fourteen (14) years applying for a license to hunt big or trophy game animals under this subsection shall have the application for the license co-signed by his parent or legal guardian.

No person fourteen (14) years or older nor any nonresident person less than fourteen (14) years shall take any small game animal without first obtaining the proper license. A nonresident person less than fourteen (14) years need not obtain a small game animal license if accompanied by an adult possessing a valid unexpired Wyoming small game animal license in which case the nonresident person’s bag limit as established by law or by commission orders shall be applied to and limited by the small game hunting license held by the adult person in his company.

No person fourteen (14) years of age or older shall take any game bird without obtaining the proper license. A resident person under fourteen (14) years of age may take any game bird in this state except wild turkey without a license if accompanied by an adult. A resident or nonresident person under fourteen (14) years of age may take a wild turkey with the proper license if accompanied by an adult. The taking of any game bird by a nonresident person less than fourteen (14) years of age accompanied by an adult person possessing a valid game bird license shall, as established by law and commission order, be applied to and limited by the bag limit under the license held by the adult in company.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, §§ 28, 29; C.S. 1945, §§ 47-201, 47-202; W.S. 1957, §§ 23-38, 23-39; Laws 1965, ch. 184, § 7; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-34; Laws 1979, ch. 128, § 1; 1991, ch. 254, § 1; 1993, ch. 63, § 1; 1997, ch. 14, § 1; 2021 ch. 94, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added ", except that any person may take a big or trophy game animal at eleven (11) years of age if the person will attain twelve (12) years of age by the end of that calendar year" in the first sentence of (a).

§ 23-2-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 121, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 34, related to military hunting licenses.

§ 23-2-104.
Archery licenses; special seasons; prohibition against firearms; equipment.

Bow and arrow or crossbow are permissible equipment to take game animals, nongame animals, game birds and nongame fish. No license is required to take nongame animals and nongame fish with bow and arrow or crossbow.

The commission may establish special hunting seasons for the taking of big game or trophy game animals by bow and arrow or crossbow in such areas as it may establish by order.

No person shall hunt big game or trophy game with bow and arrow or crossbow during a special archery hunting season without first obtaining an archery license and the appropriate hunting license.

No person holding an archery license shall take big game or trophy game animals during a special archery hunting season or during a limited quota archery only hunting season by the use of any type of firearm. Any person who takes a big game or trophy game animal by the use of a firearm during a special archery hunting season or during a limited quota archery only hunting season is guilty of a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii). Upon request by a game warden or other Wyoming law enforcement officer, a person who has taken a big or trophy game animal during a special archery hunting season or during a limited quota archery only hunting season shall allow testing of the animal’s tissue for confirmation of compliance with this section.

The commission shall establish by rule and regulation specifications for crossbows, longbows, recurve bows, compound bows, arrows and broadheads for taking of big or trophy game animals. The rules and regulations promulgated under the provisions of this subsection relating to the hunting of big or trophy game animals shall also apply to the hunting of the gray wolf as a trophy game animal from and after the date gray wolves are removed from the list of experimental nonessential population, endangered species or threatened species in Wyoming as provided by W.S.

23-1-108

.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 90, § 2.

Except as otherwise provided, violation of this section or rules promulgated under subsection (e) of this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 51; C.S. 1945, § 47-404; Laws 1953, ch. 108, § 1; 1957, ch. 216, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-41; Laws 1961, ch. 201; 1969, ch. 121, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-36; Laws 1977, ch. 104, § 1; 1987, ch. 9, § 1; 1989, ch. 189, § 1; 2003, ch. 115, § 2; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; ch. 90, §§ 1, 2; ch. 194, § 1; 2012, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalties for misdemeanors, see §

6-10-103

.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “tenth degree” in (g).

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 90, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2007, in (e) inserted “and” preceding “a positive safety mechanism”; deleted “and except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, which must be cocked by hand without the aid of leverage gaining devices”; and repealed former (f), which read: “The commission by rule and regulation may authorize a person to use a leverage-gaining device for cocking a crossbow if the person is unable to manually cock a crossbow as the result of a permanent or temporary physical handicap or impairment.”

The third 2007 amendment, by ch. 194, § 1, rewrote (d).

Laws 2007, ch. 194, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (e), deleted the former first five sentences, which read: “When hunting antelope, bighorn sheep, black bear, deer, mountain goat or mountain lion the longbow hunter must be equipped with a longbow of not less than forty (40) pounds draw weight or possessing the ability to cast a hunting arrow of four hundred (400) grain weight at least one hundred sixty (160) yards. When hunting elk, grizzly bear or moose, the longbow hunter must be equipped with a longbow of not less than fifty (50) pounds draw weight or possessing the ability to cast a hunting arrow of five hundred (500) grain weight at least one hundred sixty (160) yards. The crossbow hunter must be equipped with a crossbow of not less than ninety (90) pounds draw weight which has a minimum draw length of fourteen (14) inches (from front of bow to back of string in the cocked position) and a positive safety mechanism.
Crossbow bolts must be at least sixteen (16) inches long.
The broadhead of arrows or bolts shall be of sharp steel with a minimum cutting width of one (1) inch,” added the present first sentence, inserted “rules and regulations promulgated under the” in the present second sentence and substituted “big or trophy game animals” for “antelope, bighorn sheep, black bear, deer, mountain goat and mountain lion”; and inserted “or rules promulgated under subsection (e) of this section” in (g).

§ 23-2-105.
License to hunt with falcons; license to take falcons; special seasons.

Any person holding a valid Wyoming license for game birds or small game animals may purchase a license to hunt with falcon from the department at its office in Cheyenne, Wyoming.

A license to hunt with falcon entitles the licensee to take game birds and small game animals with the use of falcons or hawks so long as that person also holds a valid Wyoming hunting license for the wildlife to be hunted.

The commission under such safeguards as it deems necessary may grant licenses to take falcons or hawks for lawful falconry purposes. The commission shall also regulate or prohibit the exportation of hawks or falcons from the state.

The commission may establish special seasons for hunting game birds or small game animals with falcons or hawks in areas which it establishes by order.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 122, §§ 3, 4; W.S. 1957, §§ 23-108.8, 23-108.9; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-37; Laws 1979, ch. 45, § 1.

§ 23-2-106.
Hunter safety; exception.

Except as provided in subsections (c), (d) and (e) of this section, no person born on or after January 1, 1966, may take any wildlife by the use of firearms on land other than that of his own family, unless the person possesses or can demonstrate they have obtained a certificate of competency and safety in the use and handling of firearms as provided by subsection (b) of this section.

The department shall institute and coordinate a statewide course of instruction in safety and competency in handling firearms. The department may cooperate with local governmental agencies or private organizations in providing hunter safety courses. The department may establish and charge a reasonable fee for enrollment in a hunter safety course. Attendance and successful completion of a hunter safety course offered by an association or governmental agency approved by the commission satisfies the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a person who has not received a certificate of competency and safety in the use and handling of firearms as provided by subsection (b) of this section may apply to the department for a special authorization to take wildlife with the use of a firearm while being accompanied by a person who has attained the age of majority, acting as a mentor, who possesses or can demonstrate he has obtained a certificate of competency and safety in the use and handling of firearms and who possesses a valid Wyoming hunting license. A mentor shall not provide supervision for more than one (1) person, other than immediate family members, at a time in the field. The special authorization shall be valid for not more than one (1) year. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as altering the requirements of W.S. 23-2-102(a). The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this subsection and subsection (e) of this section.

The requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to the following persons:

Any active member, honorably discharged past member or veteran of the armed forces of the United States;

Any active or retired Wyoming peace officer who has qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

.

A person under fourteen (14) years of age who has not yet received a certificate of competency and safety in the use and handling of firearms may take small game and game birds without receiving special authorization from the department under subsection (c) of this section while being accompanied by a person who has attained the age of majority, acting as a mentor, who possesses or can demonstrate he has obtained a certificate of competency and safety in the use and handling of firearms, unless otherwise exempted as provided in subsection (a) of this section, and who possesses a valid Wyoming small game or game bird license. A mentor shall not provide supervision for more than one (1) person, other than immediate family members, at a time in the field.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 69, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

23-2-107

; 2008, ch. 38, § 1; 2014 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 146, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a), added “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section,” at the beginning, deleted “apply for and receive any Wyoming hunting license, nor” following “January 1, 1966, may,” substituted “or can demonstrate they have obtained” for “and can exhibit;” and added (c).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a), substituted “subsections (c) and (d)” for “subsection (c)”; in (c), inserted “other than immediate family members” in the second sentence, deleted the former third sentence which read “No person may apply for more than one (1) special authorization”; and added (d).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a), inserted “and (e)” and made a related change; at the beginning of (c), inserte “Except as provided in substion (e) of this section, a”, and inserted “and subsection (e) of this section” at the end of the last sentence; and added (e).

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted as §

23-2-107

but has been renumbered for numerical continuity.